New Jersey, session 222, A1987.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.2020, c.117 (C.13:1E-99.126) is amended to read as follows: 1.    The Legislature finds and declares that, since 1950, global annual production of plastics has increased from two million tons to over 381 million tons; that approximately one third of all plastics produced are single-use plastics, which are plastics designed to be used only once and then thrown away; and that an estimated 100 billion single-use plastic carryout bags and 25 billion styrofoam plastic coffee cups are thrown away in the United States each year. The Legislature further finds that, in 2017, only 8.4 percent of plastics in the United States were recycled; that most single-use plastics are disposed of in landfills, are incinerated, or become litter in waterways and oceans; that plastics released in the environment do not biodegrade, but instead break down into smaller pieces, known as microplastics, which accumulate in the natural environment and are eaten by fish and other marine life; and that microplastic pollution moves through natural food webs and accumulates in fish and shellfish tissues, which means microplastics and associated pollutants can move into the food chain. The Legislature further finds that approximately eight million tons of plastic end up in the oceans annually; that, without action, scientists estimate that by 2050 the mass of plastic pollution in the ocean will exceed the mass of fish; that currently, there is a collection of litter in the North Pacific Ocean, known as the Great Pacific Garbage Patch, that is 7.7 million square miles and is composed primarily of plastics; that one study found plastics in the gut of every sea turtle examined and in 90 percent of seabirds examined; and that plastics have been known to cause death or reproductive failure in sea turtles, birds, and other organisms that ingest plastic. The Legislature further finds that, as plastics break down through photodegradation, they release harmful chemicals such as bisphenol A (BPA) into the environment that have been linked to health problems in humans; that these chemicals enter the food chain when consumed by marine life; and that single-use plastic waste creates visual pollution, degrades water quality, and impacts the tourism, fishing, and shipping industries, all of which are major contributors to the New Jersey economy. The Legislature therefore determines that it is no longer conscionable to permit the unfettered use and disposal of single-use plastics in the State; that New Jersey must do its part to minimize plastic pollution in the ocean, and to ensure that future generations have a clean and healthy environment to live, work, and recreate in; that banning or limiting the use of single-use plastic carryout bags, polystyrene foam food service products, and single-use plastic straws is a significant step in this effort, as these items are among the most significant sources of beach and ocean pollution; that New Jersey joins several other states and hundreds of municipalities across the country in banning or limiting the use of single-use plastics; and that such bans and limitations have drastically lowered consumer consumption of single-use plastics. The Legislature further finds that single-use paper carryout bags use as much or more energy and resources to manufacture and transport than single-use plastic carryout bags and contribute to harmful air emissions.  Consequently, the Legislature further determines that it is in the public interest to prohibit grocery stores from providing single-use paper carryout bags , unless they contain a significant quantity of postconsumer recycled content. The Legislature further finds that the State's nascent hemp-growing industry, regulated through the New Jersey Department of Agriculture's Division of Plant Industry, would be a significant force in creating biodegradable raw materials that can be turned into hemp-based bio-packaging, which breaks down in approximately 90 days versus the dozens of years it takes petroleum-based plastics to break down into microplastics in the ocean. (cf:  P.L.2020, c.117, s.1) 2.    Section 2 of P.L.2020, c.117 (C.13:1E-99.127) is amended to read as follows: 2.    As used in P.L.2020, c.117 (C.13:1E-99.126 et al.): "Carryout bag" means a bag that is provided by a store or food service business to a customer for the purpose of transporting groceries, prepared foods, or retail goods. "Carryout bag" shall not include: (1)  a bag used solely to contain or wrap uncooked meat, fish, or poultry; (2)  a bag used solely to package loose items such as fruits, vegetables, nuts, coffee, grains, baked goods, candy, greeting cards, flowers, or small hardware items; (3)  a bag used solely to contain live animals, such as fish or insects sold in a pet store; (4)  a bag used solely to contain food sliced or prepared to order, including soup or hot food; (5)  a laundry, dry cleaning, or garment bag; (6)  a bag provided by a pharmacy to carry prescription drugs; (7)  a newspaper bag; and (8)  any similar bag, as determined by the department pursuant to rule, regulation, or guidance. "Department" means the Department of Environmental Protection. "Food service business" means a business that sells or provides food for consumption on or off the premises, and includes, but is not limited to, any restaurant, café, delicatessen, coffee shop, convenience store, grocery store, vending truck or cart, food truck, movie theater, or business or institutional cafeteria, including those operated by or on behalf of any governmental entity. "Grocery store" means a self-service retail establishment that occupies at least 2,500 square feet and that sells household foodstuffs for off-site consumption, including, but not limited to, fresh produce, meat, poultry, fish, deli products, dairy products, canned foods, dry foods, beverages, baked foods, or prepared foods. "Grocery store" shall not include an establishment that handles only prepackaged food that does not require time or temperature controls for food safety. "Hemp product" means a finished product with a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of not more than 0.3 percent that is derived from or made by processing a hemp plant or plant part and prepared in a form available for commercial sale. "Person" means any individual, corporation, company, association, society, firm, partnership, joint stock company, or governmental entity. "Plastic" means a synthetic material made from linking monomers through a chemical reaction to create an organic polymer chain that can be molded or extruded at high heat into various solid forms retaining their defined shapes during the life cycle and after disposal. "Polystyrene foam" means blown polystyrene and expanded and extruded foams that are thermoplastic petrochemical materials utilizing a styrene monomer and processed by a number of techniques, including, but not limited to, fusion of polymer spheres (expandable bead polystyrene), injection molding, foam molding, and extrusion-blow molding (extruded foam polystyrene). "Polystyrene foam food service product" means a product made, in whole or in part, of polystyrene foam that is used for selling or providing a food or beverage, and includes, but is not limited to, a food container, plate, hot or cold beverage cup, meat or vegetable tray, cutlery, or egg carton. "Reusable carryout bag" means a carryout bag that:  (1) is made of polypropylene, PET nonwoven fabric, nylon, cloth, hemp product, or other machine washable fabric; (2) has stitched handles; and (3) is designed and manufactured for multiple reuse. "Single-use paper carryout bag" means a carryout bag made of paper that is not a reusable carryout bag. "Single-use plastic carryout bag" means a carryout bag made of plastic that is not a reusable carryout bag. "Store" means any grocery store, convenience store, liquor store, pharmacy, drug store, or other retail establishment. "Sustainable paper carryout bag" means a single-use paper carryout bag that meets or exceeds the postconsumer recycled content requirements of section 6 of P.L.2021, c.391 (C.13:1E-99.140). (cf:  P.L.2020, c.117, s.2) 3.  Section 3 of P.L.2020, c.117 (C.13:1E-99.128) is amended to read as follows: 3. a. Beginning 18 months after the effective date of P.L.2020, c.117 (C.13:1E-99.126 et al.): (1)  no store or food service business shall provide or sell a single-use plastic carryout bag to a customer; and (2)  no grocery store shall provide or sell a single-use paper carryout bag that is not a sustainable paper carryout bag to a customer. b.    A municipality or county shall not adopt any rule, regulation, code, or ordinance concerning the regulation or prohibition of single-use plastic carryout bags or single-use paper carryout bags after the effective date of P.L.2020, c.117 (C.13:1E-99.126 et al.). c.    Beginning 18 months after the effective date of P.L.2020, c.117 (C.13:1E-99.126 et al.), this section shall supersede and preempt any municipal or county rule, regulation, code, or ordinance concerning the regulation or prohibition of single-use plastic carryout bags or single-use paper carryout bags that was enacted prior to the effective date of P.L.2020, c.117 (C.13:1E-99.126 et al.). d.    Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection a. of this section to the contrary, beginning 24 months after the effective date of P.L.2020, c.117 (C.13:1E-99.126 et al.), no food bank or food pantry shall provide a single-use plastic carryout bag to a customer. As used in this subsection: "Food bank" means the same as the term is defined in section 2 of P.L.1982, c.178 (C.24:4A-2). "Food pantry" means a nonprofit organization or government entity that distributes food to individuals in need of assistance, including, but not limited to, a soup kitchen, homeless shelter, or religious organization. (cf:  P.L.2022, c.6, s.1) 4.  This act shall take effect immediately.